Utah statutes.
26-21-211.   Timing of implementation.

(1)  A covered provider or covered contractor who engages a covered individual beginning on or after May 8, 2012 must obtain clearance for the covered individual under this part.

(2)  For a covered individual engaged to perform services prior to May 8, 2012, the covered provider or covered contractor does not have to obtain clearance for the covered individual under this part:

(a)  until the date the covered contractor or covered provider renews its license under this chapter; or

(b)  if the license renewal under Subsection (2)(a) is prior to January 1, 2013, within six months after the date of the license renewal.

